Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.085

Election of officers.

The directors shall elect a president and one or more vice presidents, who need not be directors. If the president and vice presidents are not members of the board of directors, the directors shall elect from their number a chair of the board of directors and one or more vice chairs. They shall also elect a secretary and treasurer, who need not be directors, and they may combine the two offices and designate the combined office as secretary-treasurer. The treasurer may be a bank or any depository, and as such shall not be considered an officer but a function of the board of directors. In such case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, except that the funds shall be deposited only as authorized by the board of directors.

[ 2011 c 336 s 654; 1989 c 307 s 11.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.